New York, session 2025-2026, S4625.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 120.80 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 120.80 Aggravated assault in the third degree. 4 A person is guilty of aggravated assault in the third degree when such 5 person commits the crime of assault in the third degree as defined in 6 section 120.00 of this article and is aided by another person who is 7 physically present. 8 Aggravated assault in the third degree is a class E felony. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 10 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08599-01-5